Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.901

Intent—1987 c 4.

The separation of definitions and authorized activities provisions of the state's gambling statutes into shorter sections is intended to improve the readability and facilitate the future amendment of these sections. This separation shall not change the meaning of any of the provisions involved.

[ 1987 c 4 s 1.]